Massachusetts, session 194th, H4667.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary and subject to
appropriation, the department of mental health shall establish a mental health capacity grant
program for the purpose of addressing increased mental health needs in nonprofit organizations
at high-risk of hate crime and nonprofits that serve populations at high risk of hate crimes, as
defined in section 32 of chapter 22C of the General Laws for the purposes of this act.
The program shall make grants available to said nonprofit organizations at high risk of
hate crimes and those that serve populations at high risk of hate crimes to increase behavioral
health competency of staff who have frequent interactions with targeted communities and to
expand supportive programming for said staff and said communities. The grants shall be used to
support programming determined by an organization’s specific needs to address mental health,
including, but not limited to: (a) mental health first aid training; (b) culturally responsive referral
programs; (c) community education and destigmatization of mental health supports; or (d) any
other programming shown to positively affect mental health.
of 2

The department shall promulgate regulations and may issue further guidance regarding
grantmaking; provided, that grants shall be distributed in a geographically equitable manner
across the commonwealth and distributed in a manner that correlates with bias types included in
the preceding year’s annual hate crime report by the executive office of public safety and
security.
Not later than 12 months from the distribution of the first grant and annually thereafter,
the commissioner of mental health shall file a report with the clerks of the senate and the house
of representatives, the joint committee on mental health, substance use and recovery, the joint
committee on racial equity, civil rights, and inclusion and the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing the grant program activities, which shall include, but shall not be
limited to: (i) the number of applications received; (ii) the number of grants awarded; (iii) the
dollar amount per grant; (iv) the organizational mission of each grantee; (v) the programming
supported by each grant; and (vi) priority populations based on annual state reporting on hate
crimes and the regional distribution of such funds.
of 2